Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Temporary Administration

Law reviews.

For article, “Marriage, Death and Taxes:
The Estate Planning Impact of Windsor and Obergefell on Georgia’s Same Sex Spouses,” see 21 Ga. St. Bar. J. 9 (Oct. 2015).

53-6-30.
Power of court; appointment of administrator; appeal.

The probate court may at any time and without service or notice to anyone grant temporary letters of administration on an unrepresented estate to continue in full force and effect until the temporary administrator is discharged or a personal representative is appointed.

The probate court may appoint such person as temporary administrator as the court determines to be in the best interests of the estate. Pending an issue of devisavit vel non upon any paper propounded as a will that has not been admitted to probate in common form, the executor nominated in the purported will shall have preference in the appointment of a temporary administrator.

There shall be no appeal from an order granting temporary letters of administration, either to the superior court under subsection (a) of Code Section 5-3-2 or to the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals under subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-123.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 23; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-32/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “service or notice to anyone” for “notice” in subsection (a); substituted “that has not” for “which as not” in the second sentence of subsection (b); and added “, either to the superior court under subsection (a) of Code Section 5-3-2 or to the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals under subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-123” to the end of subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

53-6-31.
Power of administrator.

A temporary administrator may bring an action for the collection of debts or for personal property of the decedent. If a personal representative is appointed pending such action, the personal representative may be substituted for the temporary administrator as a party in the manner provided by Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 9.

A temporary administrator may bring, support, or oppose an action to approve a settlement agreement under Code Section 53-5-25. If a personal representative is appointed pending such action, the personal representative may be substituted for the temporary administrator as a party in the manner provided by Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 9.

A temporary administrator shall have the power to collect and preserve the assets of the estate and to expend funds for this purpose if approved by the judge of the probate court after such notice as the judge deems necessary; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall limit or reduce the notice requirements imposed by Code Sections 53-6-64 and 53-7-4.

A temporary administrator appointed pursuant to Code Section 53-3-21 shall have the power to perform the duties of a personal representative under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-3-7 or under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-3-12, as ordered by the judge of the probate court.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 24; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-33/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the first two sentences of the previously existing provisions as subsection (a) and, in the second sentence of subsection (a), substituted “such action” for “the action” near the middle, and substituted “substituted for the temporary administrator as a party in the manner provided by Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 9” for “made a party in lieu of the temporary administrator” at the end; added subsection (b); designated the last sentence of the previously existing provisions as subsection (c) and, in subsection (c), added the proviso at the end; and added subsection (d).

53-6-32.
Oath or affirmation of temporary administrator.

Every temporary administrator, upon qualification (which qualification may be done at any time), shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in substantially the following form:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that
_______________ , deceased, died (testate) (intestate) and with an estate that is currently unrepresented, so far as I know or believe, and that I will well and truly administer on all the estate of the Deceased and discharge to the best of my ability all my duties as Temporary Administrator. So help me God.”

The oath or affirmation of a temporary administrator as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The probate court appointing the temporary administrator shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any state to administer the oath or affirmation.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-34/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.